District of Columbia statutes.
31-3609

Incontestability period.

(a)

If a policy or certificate has been in force for less than 6 months, an insurer may rescind a long-term care insurance policy or certificate or deny an otherwise valid long-term care insurance claim upon a showing of misrepresentation that is material to the acceptance for coverage.

(b)

If a policy or certificate has been in force for at least 6 months, but less than 2 years, an insurer may rescind a long-term care insurance policy or certificate or deny an otherwise valid long-term care insurance claim upon a showing of misrepresentation that is both material to the acceptance for coverage and which pertains to the condition for which benefits are sought.

(c)

After a policy or certificate has been in force for 2 years, it shall not be contestable upon the grounds of misrepresentations alone. The policy or certificate may be contested only upon a showing that the insured knowingly and intentionally misrepresented relevant facts relating to the insured’s health.

(d)

(1)

No long-term care insurance policy or certificate may be field unless based on medical or health status.

(2)

For purposes of this subsection, the term “field issued” means a policy or certificate issued by an agent or third party administrator pursuant to the underwriting authority granted to the agent or third party administrator by an insurer.

(e)

If an insurer has paid benefits under a long-term care insurance policy or certificate, the benefit payments may not be recovered by the insurer in the event that the policy or certificate is rescinded.

(f)

(1)

In the event of the death of the insured, this section shall not apply to the remaining death benefits of a life insurance policy that accelerates benefits for long term care; except that, in the event of death of the insured, the remaining death benefits under these policies shall be governed by § 31-4803.

May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-121, § 10, 47 DCR 2038
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Long-Term Care Insurance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-147, July 18, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 6097).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 35-4909.1 1981 Ed., see § 2(c) of the Long-Term Care Insurance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-312, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2738).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 35-4909.1 1981 Ed., see § 2(c) of the Long-Term Care Insurance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-370, July 10, 2000, 47 DCR 5838).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 31-3609.01, see § 502(c) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).